Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-102.3 Redomestication; approval as
a domestic captive insurer. (a) Any foreign or alien captive insurance
company may become a domestic captive insurance company by meeting the
following requirements:

(1) Complying with all of the requirements relating
to the organization and licensing of a domestic captive insurance company of
the same type, and any requirements that the commissioner may adopt by rule;

(2) Amending and restating its organizational
documents in compliance with the laws of this State, and submitting the amended
and restated organizational documents for the commissioner's review; and

(3) Petitioning the commissioner to issue a
certificate of general good, which sets forth the commissioner's finding that
the redomestication and maintenance of the company will promote the general
good of the State. In arriving at the finding, the commissioner shall consider
the factors set forth in section 431:19-106(b). The petition shall include a
nonrefundable application fee.

(b) Upon issuance of the certificate of
general good by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a)(3), the foreign or
alien captive insurance company shall file the following with the department of
commerce and consumer affairs:

(1) Articles of redomestication, which shall include:

(A) Name of the company;

(B) Date and location of incorporation or
organization;

(C) Street address of the principal office in
this State;

(D) Names and titles of the:

(i) Officers and directors of the company; or

(ii) Members of the governing body;

(E) A statement that the company is moving
its domicile to this State;

(F) A statement that redomestication will
occur upon filing the articles of redomestication and that the company shall be
subject to the laws of this State; and

(G) A statement that copies of the articles
of incorporation or other organizational document and any amendments certified
by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the company
is incorporated or organized are attached; provided that if any of these
documents are in a foreign language, a translation under oath of the translator
shall accompany these documents;

(2) Certificate of general good issued pursuant to
subsection (a)(3);

(3) Certificate of good standing or comparable documentation
certified by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under which the foreign or
alien captive insurance company is incorporated or organized; provided that:

(A) The certificate or documentation shall be
dated not earlier than thirty days prior to the date of the certificate of
general good; and

(B) If the certificate of good standing or
documentation is in a foreign language, a translation under oath of the
translator shall accompany the certificate or documentation; and

(4) The company's organizational documents, which
shall be amended and restated in compliance with the laws of this State.

(c) Upon payment of the license fee and annual
renewal fees, the domestic captive insurance company shall be entitled to the
necessary or appropriate certificates and licenses to do business in this State
and shall be subject to the authority and jurisdiction of this State. No
captive insurance company redomesticating into this State need merge,
consolidate, transfer assets, or otherwise engage in any other reorganization,
other than as specified in this section.

(d) Upon redomestication in accordance with
this section, the foreign or alien captive insurance company shall become a
domestic captive insurance company organized under the laws of this State and
shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and be subject to
all applicable laws, duties, and liabilities of a domestic captive insurance
company of the same type. The domestic captive insurance company shall possess
all rights that it had prior to the redomestication to the extent permitted by
the laws of this State and shall be responsible and liable for all the
liabilities and obligations that it was subject to prior to the
redomestication. All outstanding policies of the captive insurance company
shall remain in full force and effect. [L 1993, c 205, pt of §1; am L 1994, c
128, §7; am L 2007, c 232, §4; am L 2012, c 253, §8; am L 2013, c 190, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next